Utah statutes.
48-2c-107.    Limited liability company name -- Limited rights.

The authorization to file articles of organization under this chapter or to reserve or register a company name as granted by the division does not:

(1)  abrogate or limit the law governing unfair competition or unfair trade practices;

(2)  derogate from the common law, the principles of equity, or the statutes of this state or of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect names and trademarks; or

(3)  create an exclusive right in geographic or generic terms contained within a name.

